Mississippi statutes. Title 25. Public Officers and Employees; Public Records
Article 3. Conflict of Interest; Improper Use of Office.

§ 25-4-101.
Declaration of public policy.

The Legislature declares that elective and public office and employment is a public trust and any effort to realize personal gain through official conduct, other than as provided by law, or as a natural consequence of the employment or position, is a violation of that trust. Therefore, public servants shall endeavor to pursue a course of conduct which will not raise suspicion among the public that they are likely to be engaged in acts that are in violation of this trust and which will not reflect unfavorably upon the state and local governments.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1983, ch. 469, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1983.

§ 25-4-103.
Definitions.

The following definitions apply in this article unless the context otherwise requires:

“Authority” means any component unit of a governmental entity.

“Benefit” means any gain or advantage to the beneficiary, including any gain or advantage to a third person pursuant to the desire or consent of the beneficiary.

“Business” means any corporation, partnership, sole proprietorship, firm, enterprise, franchise, association, organization, holding company, self-employed individual, joint-stock company, receivership, trust or other legal entity or undertaking organized for economic gain, a nonprofit corporation or other such entity, association or organization receiving public funds.

“Business with which he is associated” means any business of which a public servant or his relative is an officer, director, owner, partner, employee or is a holder of more than ten percent (10%) of the fair market value or from which he or his relative derives more than Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) in annual income or over which such public servant or his relative exercises control.

“Compensation” means money or thing of value received, or to be received, from any person for services rendered.

“Contract” means:

Any agreement to which the government is a party; or

Any agreement on behalf of the government which involves the payment of public funds.

“Government” means the state and all political entities thereof, both collectively and separately, including, but not limited to:

Counties;

Municipalities;

All school districts;

All courts; and

Any department, agency, board, commission, institution, instrumentality, or legislative or administrative body of the state, counties or municipalities created by statute, ordinance or executive order including all units that expend public funds.

“Governmental entity” means the state, a county, a municipality or any other separate political subdivision authorized by law to exercise a part of the sovereign power of the state.

“Income” means money or thing of value received, or to be received, from any source derived, including, but not limited to, any salary, wage, advance, payment, dividend, interest, rent, forgiveness of debt, fee, royalty, commission or any combination thereof.

“Intellectual property” means any formula, pattern, compilation, program, device, method, technique or process created primarily as a result of the research effort of an employee or employees of an institution of higher learning of the State of Mississippi.

“Material financial interest” means a personal and pecuniary interest, direct or indirect, accruing to a public servant or spouse, either individually or in combination with each other. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the following shall not be deemed to be a material financial interest with respect to a business with which a public servant may be associated:

Ownership of any interest of less than ten percent (10%) in a business where the aggregate annual net income to the public servant therefrom is less than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00);

Ownership of any interest of less than two percent (2%) in a business where the aggregate annual net income to the public servant therefrom is less than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00);

The income as an employee of a relative if neither the public servant or relative is an officer, director or partner in the business and any ownership interest would not be deemed material pursuant to subparagraph (i) or (ii) herein; or

The income of the spouse of a public servant when such spouse is a contractor, subcontractor or vendor with the governmental entity that employs the public servant and the public servant exercises no control, direct or indirect, over the contract between the spouse and such governmental entity.

“Pecuniary benefit” means benefit in the form of money, property, commercial interests or anything else the primary significance of which is economic gain. Expenses associated with social occasions afforded public servants shall not be deemed a pecuniary benefit.

“Person” means any individual, firm, business, corporation, association, partnership, union or other legal entity, and where appropriate a governmental entity.

“Property” means all real or personal property.

“Public funds” means money belonging to the government.

“Public servant” means:

Any elected or appointed official of the government;

Any officer, director, commissioner, supervisor, chief, head, agent or employee of the government or any agency thereof, or of any public entity created by or under the laws of the State of Mississippi or created by an agency or governmental entity thereof, any of which is funded by public funds or which expends, authorizes or recommends the use of public funds; or

Any individual who receives a salary, per diem or expenses paid in whole or in part out of funds authorized to be expended by the government.

“Relative” means:

The spouse of the public servant;

The child of the public servant;

The parent of the public servant;

The sibling of the public servant; and

The spouse of any of the relatives of the public servant specified in subparagraphs (ii) through (iv).

“Securities” means stocks, bonds, notes, convertible debentures, warrants, evidences of debts or property or other such documents.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1983, ch. 469, § 2 [See Editor’s Note below]; Laws, 1991, ch. 572 § 1; Laws, 1992, ch. 530, § 9; Laws, 2008, ch. 562, § 12, eff August 5, 2008 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the amendment of this section).

§ 25-4-105.
Certain actions, activities and business relationships prohibited or authorized; contracts in violation of section voidable; penalties.

No public servant shall use his official position to obtain, or attempt to obtain, pecuniary benefit for himself other than that compensation provided for by law, or to obtain, or attempt to obtain, pecuniary benefit for any relative or any business with which he is associated.

No public servant shall be interested, directly or indirectly, during the term for which he shall have been chosen, or within one (1) year after the expiration of such term, in any contract with the state, or any district, county, city or town thereof, authorized by any law passed or order made by any board of which he may be or may have been a member.

No public servant shall:

Be a contractor, subcontractor or vendor with the governmental entity of which he is a member, officer, employee or agent, other than in his contract of employment, or have a material financial interest in any business which is a contractor, subcontractor or vendor with the governmental entity of which he is a member, officer, employee or agent.

Be a purchaser, direct or indirect, at any sale made by him in his official capacity or by the governmental entity of which he is an officer or employee, except in respect of the sale of goods or services when provided as public utilities or offered to the general public on a uniform price schedule.

Be a purchaser, direct or indirect, of any claim, certificate, warrant or other security issued by or to be paid out of the treasury of the governmental entity of which he is an officer or employee.

Perform any service for any compensation during his term of office or employment by which he attempts to influence a decision of the authority of the governmental entity of which he is a member.

Perform any service for any compensation for any person or business after termination of his office or employment in relation to any case, decision, proceeding or application with respect to which he was directly concerned or in which he personally participated during the period of his service or employment.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (3) of this section, a public servant or his relative:

May be an officer or stockholder of banks or savings and loan associations or other such financial institutions bidding for bonds, notes or other evidences of debt or for the privilege of keeping as depositories the public funds of a governmental entity thereof or the editor or employee of any newspaper in which legal notices are required to be published in respect to the publication of said legal notices.

May be a contractor or vendor with any authority of the governmental entity other than the authority of the governmental entity of which he is a member, officer, employee or agent or have a material financial interest in a business which is a contractor or vendor with any authority of the governmental entity other than the authority of the governmental entity of which he is a member, officer, employee or agent where such contract is let to the lowest and best bidder after competitive bidding and three (3) or more legitimate bids are received or where the goods, services or property involved are reasonably available from two (2) or fewer commercial sources, provided such transactions comply with the public purchases laws.

May be a subcontractor with any authority of the governmental entity other than the authority of the governmental entity of which he is a member, officer, employee or agent or have a material financial interest in a business which is a subcontractor with any authority of the governmental entity other than the authority of the governmental entity of which he is a member, officer, employee or agent where the primary contract is let to the lowest and best bidder after competitive bidding or where such goods or services involved are reasonably available from two (2) or fewer commercial sources, provided such transactions comply with the public purchases laws.

May be a contractor, subcontractor or vendor with any authority of the governmental entity of which he is a member, officer, employee or agent or have a material financial interest in a business which is a contractor, subcontractor or vendor with any authority of the governmental entity of which he is a member, officer, employee or agent: (i) where such goods or services involved are reasonably available from two (2) or fewer commercial sources, provided such transactions comply with the public purchases laws; or (ii) where the contractual relationship involves the further research, development, testing, promotion or merchandising of an intellectual property created by the public servant.

May purchase securities issued by the governmental entity of which he is an officer or employee if such securities are offered to the general public and are purchased at the same price as such securities are offered to the general public.

May have an interest less than a material financial interest in a business which is a contractor, subcontractor or vendor with any governmental entity.

May contract with the Mississippi Veteran’s Home Purchase Board, Mississippi Housing Finance Corporation, or any other state loan program, for the purpose of securing a loan; however, public servants shall not receive favored treatment.

May be employed by or receive compensation from an authority of the governmental entity other than the authority of the governmental entity of which the public servant is an officer or employee.

If a member of the Legislature or other public servant employed on less than a full-time basis, may represent a person or organization for compensation before an authority of the governmental entity other than an authority of the governmental entity of which he is an officer or employee.

If a constable, may be employed and receive compensation as a deputy sheriff or other employee of the county for which he serves as constable.

No person may intentionally use or disclose information gained in the course of or by reason of his official position or employment as a public servant in any way that could result in pecuniary benefit for himself, any relative, or any other person, if the information has not been communicated to the public or is not public information.

Any contract made in violation of this section may be declared void by the governing body of the contracting or selling authority of the governmental subdivision or a court of competent jurisdiction and the contractor or subcontractor shall retain or receive only the reasonable value, with no increment for profit or commission, of the property or the services furnished prior to the date of receiving notice that the contract has been voided.

Any person violating the provisions of this section shall be punished as provided for in Sections 25-4-109 and 25-4-111.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1983, ch. 469, § 3; Laws, 1988, ch. 546, § 4; Laws, 1992, ch. 530, § 10; Laws, 1994, ch. 586, § 1; Laws, 1998, ch. 490, § 1; Laws, 2000, ch. 578, § 2; Laws, 2008, ch. 562, § 13, eff August 5, 2008 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the amendment of this section).

§ 25-4-107.
Complaints; where brought; removal; initiated by; defendant’s right to jury trial.

The commission may pursue enforcement of this chapter by means of hearings held before the commission or an independent hearing officer to determine whether a respondent violated the law and, if so, what penalty should be imposed. Hearings shall be conducted according to the Mississippi Rules of Civil Procedure and the Mississippi Rules of Evidence.

Any person aggrieved by a decision of the commission made pursuant to its hearing procedures may appeal de novo to the Circuit Court for Hinds County, and execution of the commission’s decision shall be stayed upon the filing of a notice of appeal.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1983, ch. 469, § 4; Laws, 2008, ch. 562, § 14, eff August 5, 2008 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the amendment of this section).

§ 25-4-109.
Penalties; elected and nonelected public servants.

Upon a finding by clear and convincing evidence that any elected public servant or other person has violated any provision of this article, the commission may censure the elected public servant or impose a civil fine of not more than Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00), or both. The commission may further recommend to the Circuit Court for Hinds County that the elected public servant be removed from office.

Upon a finding by clear and convincing evidence that any nonelected public servant has violated any provision of this article, the commission may censure the nonelected public servant or impose a civil fine of not more than Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00), or both. The commission may further recommend to the Circuit Court for Hinds County that the nonelected public servant be removed from office, suspended, or subjected to a demotion or reduction in pay.

The commission may order restitution or other equitable or legal remedies to recover public funds or property unlawfully taken, as well as unjust enrichment, although not public funds. Any pecuniary benefit received by a public servant in violation of this article may be declared forfeited by the commission for the benefit of the governmental entity injured.

In the event a public servant does not appeal the decision or recommendation of the commission, the commission may petition the Circuit Court for Hinds County for the removal, suspension, demotion or reduction of pay of the public servant as provided by law.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1983, ch. 469, § 5; Laws, 2008, ch. 562, § 15, eff August 5, 2008 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the amendment of this section).

§ 25-4-111.
Authority head to take action against public servant who has violated article; conditions imposed upon former public servant.

An authority head and any other public servant having the authority to appoint a person to a position of public service, regardless of whether or not such appointment requires the approval of the senate or any other body, employee or person, shall take such action as may be ordered by a circuit court of competent jurisdiction with respect to any public employee within his authority or any such appointee upon a finding by such court that such employee or appointee has violated any provision of this article. Such action may include the imposition of the conditions described in subsection (2) of Section 25-4-109.

Upon a finding by a circuit court of competent jurisdiction that a former public servant or other person has violated any provision of this article or any order promulgated hereunder, such court shall bar or impose reasonable conditions upon:

The appearance before any authority of such former public servant or other person.

The conduct of, or negotiation or competition for, business with any authority by such former public servant or other person for such period of time as may be necessary or appropriate to effectuate the purposes of this article.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1983, ch. 469, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 1983.

§ 25-4-113.
Civil action for damages against violator of article; forfeiture of pecuniary benefit; costs and attorneys’ fees.

The Attorney General of the State of Mississippi, the commission, or any governmental entity directly injured by a violation of this article may bring a separate civil action against the public servant or other person or business violating the provisions of this article for recovery of damages suffered as a result of such violation. Further, any pecuniary benefit received by or given by a public servant in violation of this article shall be declared forfeited by a circuit court of competent jurisdiction for the benefit of the governmental entity injured. In the discretion of the court, any judgment for damages or forfeiture of pecuniary benefit may include costs of court and reasonable attorney’s fees.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1983, ch. 469, § 7; Laws, 2008, ch. 562, § 16, eff August 5, 2008 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the amendment of this section).

§ 25-4-115.
Civil liability not precluded.

This article shall not bar, suspend or otherwise restrict any right or liability to damage, penalty, forfeiture, restitution or other remedy authorized by law to be recovered or enforced in a civil action, regardless of whether the conduct involved in the proceeding constituted an offense covered by this article.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1983, ch. 469, § 8, eff from and after July 1, 1983.

§ 25-4-117.
Criminal liability not precluded.

The provisions of this article shall be in addition to any criminal laws. Actions taken under the provisions of this article shall not bar prosecution for violations of the criminal law.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1983, ch. 469, § 9, eff from and after July 1, 1983.

§ 25-4-119.
Officials not to derive pecuniary benefits as result of official duties; penalties.

No elected or appointed official shall derive any pecuniary benefit, directly or indirectly, as a result of such elected or appointed official’s duties under Sections 21-19-33, 27-109-1, 27-109-3, 27-109-7, 27-109-9, 67-1-71, 87-1-5, 95-3-25, 97-33-1, 97-33-7, 97-33-9, 97-33-17, 97-33-25, and 97-33-27. Any person convicted of a violation of this section shall be punished pursuant to the provisions of this article.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1990, ch. 573, § 15, eff from and after April 1, 1990.

§ 25-4-121.
Officials or members of immediate family, partners or associates not to derive pecuniary benefits as result of official duties under Chapter 497, Laws of 2009; penalties.

No elected or appointed official shall derive any pecuniary benefit, directly or indirectly, as a result of his duties under Chapter 497, Laws of 2009. Any elected or appointed official, any member of the immediate family or any partner or associate of the elected or appointed official, shall not derive any income from the issuance of any bonds or the disposition of any property under Chapter 497, Laws of 2009, contrary to the provisions of Section 109, Mississippi Constitution of 1890, or this article. The provisions of this section shall not apply to any person performing clerical or administrative functions, which are other than legal services provided by an attorney, that are associated with the issuance of any bonds under Chapter 497, Laws of 2009, such as the printing of bonds or other materials. Any person convicted of a violation of this subsection shall be punished by imprisonment for not less than one (1) year and not more than five (5) years and a fine of not less than Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) and not more than Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00).

HISTORY:
Laws, 2009, ch. 497, § 8, eff from and after July 1, 2009.